Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-3213
Completed report; limit on change.

An appraisal management company may not alter, modify, or otherwise change a completed report submitted by an appraiser without the appraiser's written consent.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 75.